Washington statutes.
RCW 16.38.050

Acceptance of gifts, funds, equipment, etc.

In carrying out such diagnostic service program, the director of agriculture may accept public or private funds, gifts or equipment or any other necessary properties.

[ 1969 c 100 s 5.]